California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports, and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members of the
 Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 87.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.030.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.031.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 215.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the November 7, 1978, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5p. Veterans Bond Act of 1980 [998.041. - 998.051.]

998.041.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1980.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.042.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.043.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720), Part 3, Division 4, Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.044.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of seven hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000), in the manner provided herein, but not
 otherwise, nor in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.045.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, as
 shall be required to pay the principal and interest on such bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of such revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum. 

On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest of the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of, and interest on, such bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of such bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than such principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into the
 General Fund in the State Treasury out of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by such bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.046.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article, such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as such principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to carry out the
 provisions of Section 998.047, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.047.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from moneys received from
 the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.048.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of such department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and projects
 progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.049.

While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports, and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members
 of the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 88.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.050.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.051.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1.   Approved in Proposition 2 at the June 3, 1980, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5q. Veterans Bond Act of 1982 [998.052. - 998.062.]

998.052.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.053.

The State General Obligation Bond Law, except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” shall be deemed to refer both to this article and such law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.054.

As used in this article and for the purposes of this article as used in the State General Obligation Bond Law, Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991.

(c) “Board” means the Department of Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, created by Section 988.

(e) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.055.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the provisions of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943, created by Section 991, shall be and hereby is authorized and empowered to create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000) in the manner provided herein,
 but not otherwise, nor in excess thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.056.

All bonds herein authorized, which shall have been duly sold and delivered as herein provided, shall constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected such a sum, in addition to the ordinary revenues of
 the state, as shall be required to pay the principal and interest on such bonds as herein provided, and it is hereby made the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collections of such revenue, to do and perform each and every act which shall be necessary to collect such additional sum. 

On the several dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest of the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury, all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of, and interest on, such bonds then due and payable, except as hereinafter provided for the prior redemption of such bonds, and, in the event such money so returned on said remittance dates is less than such principal and interest then due and payable, then the balance remaining unpaid shall be
 returned into the General Fund in the State Treasury out of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon thereafter as it shall become available, together with interest thereon from such dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate as borne by such bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.057.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury for the purpose of this article such an amount as will equal the following:

(a) Such sum annually as will be necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold pursuant to the provisions of this article, as such principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) Such sum as is necessary to
 carry out the provisions of Section 998.058, which sum is appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.058.

For the purposes of carrying out the provisions of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this article. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. Any moneys made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from
 moneys received from the sale of bonds sold for the purpose of carrying out this article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.059.

Upon request of the Department of Veterans Affairs, supported by a statement of the plans and projects of such department with respect thereto, and approved by the Governor, the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943 shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry such plans and projects into execution, and, if so, the amount of bonds then to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out said plans and
 projects progressively, and it shall not be necessary that all the bonds herein authorized to be issued shall be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.060.

While bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall cause to be made at the close of each fiscal year, a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, that survey to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of the surveys and projections shall be set forth in written reports, and the independent public accountant shall forward copies of the reports to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the members of the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and to the members of the
 Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943. The Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the independent public accountant for their services out of any funds that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 89.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.061.

The committee may authorize the State Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds herein authorized at such time or times as may be fixed by the State Treasurer.

Notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code, the committee may, whenever it deems it necessary to an effective sale, authorize the State Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than the par value thereof. However, the discount on the bonds so sold shall not exceed 6 percent of the par value
 thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.062.

Whenever bonds are sold, out of the first money realized from their sale, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code such sums as have been expended for the purposes specified in Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, which may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 304, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 3 at the November 2, 1982, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5r. Veterans Bond Act of 1984 [998.063. - 998.073.]

998.063.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1984.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.064.

The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” refer both to this article and that
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.065.

As used herein, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943.

(c) “Board” means the Department of
 Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.066.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than six hundred fifty million dollars ($650,000,000) in the manner provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.067.

All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the
 state, sufficient to pay the principal and interest on these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

On the dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest of the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on any bonds then due and payable, except as herein provided for the prior redemption of the bonds, and, if the money so returned on the remittance dates is less than the principal and interest then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into the General Fund out of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon
 from the dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.068.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.069, appropriated without regard
 to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.069.

For purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold by this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. All money made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from receipts from the sale of bonds sold under this article, together with
 interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.070.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.071.

(a) So long as bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and
 projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

(b) The
 Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of
 money that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 90.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.072.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times fixed by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par value
 thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.073.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 29 at the November 6, 1984, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5s. Veterans Bond Act of 1986 [998.074. - 998.084.]

998.074.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1986.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.075.

The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” refer both to this article and that
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.076.

As used herein, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943.

(c) “Board” means the Department of
 Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(e) “Bond Act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.077.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000) in the manner provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.078.

All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the
 state, sufficient to pay the principal and interest on these bonds as provided herein, and all officers required by law to perform any duty in regard to the collection of state revenues shall collect this additional sum.

On the dates on which funds are remitted pursuant to Section 16676 of the Government Code for the payment of the then maturing principal and interest of the bonds in each fiscal year, there shall be returned into the General Fund all of the money in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943, not in excess of the principal of and interest on any bonds then due and payable, except as herein provided for the prior redemption of the bonds, and, if the money so returned on the remittance dates is less than the principal and interest then due and payable, the balance remaining unpaid shall be returned into the General Fund out of the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943 as soon as it shall become available, together with interest thereon
 from the dates of maturity until so returned at the same rate of interest as borne by the bonds, compounded semiannually.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.079.

There is hereby appropriated from the General Fund, for purposes of this article, a sum of money that will equal both of the following:

(a) That sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and the interest on, the bonds issued and sold as provided herein, as that principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) That sum necessary to carry out Section 998.080, appropriated without regard
 to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.080.

For purposes of this article, the Director of Finance may, by executive order, authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of a sum of money not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold pursuant to this article. Any sums withdrawn shall be deposited in the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943. All money made available under this article to the board shall be returned by the board to the General Fund from receipts from the sale of bonds sold under this
 article, together with interest at the rate of interest fixed in the bonds so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.081.

Upon request of the board, supported by a statement of its plans and projects approved by the Governor, the committee shall determine whether to issue any bonds authorized under this article in order to carry out the board’s plans and projects, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out these plans and projects progressively, and it is not necessary that all the bonds be issued or sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.082.

(a) So long as bonds authorized under this article are outstanding, the Secretary of Veterans Affairs shall, at the close of each fiscal year, require a survey of the financial condition of the Division of Farm and Home Purchases, together with a projection of the division’s operations, to be made by an independent public accountant of recognized standing. The results of each survey and
 projection shall be reported in writing by the public accountant to the Secretary of Veterans Affairs, the California Veterans Board, the appropriate policy committees dealing with veterans affairs in the Senate and the Assembly, and the committee.

(b) The
 Division of Farm and Home Purchases shall reimburse the public accountant for these services out of
 money that the division may have available on deposit with the Treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 91.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

998.083.

The committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell all or any part of the bonds authorized by this article at the time or times fixed by the Treasurer.

Whenever the committee deems it necessary for an effective sale of the bonds, the committee may authorize the Treasurer to sell any issue of bonds at less than their par value, notwithstanding Section 16754 of the Government Code. However, the discount on the bonds shall not exceed 3 percent of the par value
 thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.084.

Out of the first money realized from the sale of bonds as provided herein, there shall be redeposited in the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund, established by Section 16724.5 of the Government Code, the amount of all expenditures made for the purposes specified in that section, and this money may be used for the same purpose and repaid in the same manner whenever additional bond sales are made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 972, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 42 at the June 3, 1986, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5t. Veterans Bond Act of 1988 [998.085. - 998.097.]

998.085.

This article may be cited as the Veterans Bond Act of 1988.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.086.

The State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise provided herein, is adopted for the purpose of the issuance, sale, and repayment of, and otherwise providing with respect to, the bonds authorized to be issued by this article, and the provisions of that law are included in this article as though set out in full in this article. All references in this article to “herein” refer both to this article and that
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.087.

As used herein, the following words shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Bond” means veterans bond, a state general obligation bond issued pursuant to this article adopting the provisions of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) “Committee” means the Veterans’ Finance Committee of 1943.

(c) “Board” means the Department of
 Veterans Affairs.

(d) “Fund” means the Veterans’ Farm and Home Building Fund of 1943.

(e) “Bond act” means this article authorizing the issuance of state general obligation bonds and adopting the State General Obligation Bond Law by reference.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.088.

For the purpose of creating a fund to provide farm and home aid for veterans in accordance with the Veterans’ Farm and Home Purchase Act of 1974 (Article 3.1 (commencing with Section 987.50)), and of all acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, the committee may create a debt or debts, liability or liabilities, of the State of California, in the aggregate amount of not more than five hundred ten million dollars ($510,000,000) in the manner provided herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 26, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 76 at the June 7, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

998.089.

All bonds authorized by this article, when duly sold and delivered as provided herein, constitute valid and legally binding general obligations of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal and interest thereof.

There shall be collected annually in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected a sum of money, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the